Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle D. Other Remedies.

§79-4-13.40.
Other remedies limited.

The legality of a proposed or completed corporate action described in Section 79-4-13.02(a) may not be contested, nor may the corporate action be enjoined, set aside or rescinded, in a legal or equitable proceeding by a shareholder after the shareholders have approved the corporate action.

Subsection (a) does not apply to a corporate action that:

Was not authorized and approved in accordance with the applicable provisions of:

Was procured as a result of fraud, a material misrepresentation, or an omission of a material fact necessary to make statements made, in light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading;

Is an interested transaction, unless it has been recommended by the board of directors in the same manner as is provided in Section 79-4-8.62 and has been approved by the shareholders in the same manner as is provided in Section 79-4-8.63 as if the interested transaction were a director’s conflicting interest transaction; or

Is approved by less than unanimous consent of the voting shareholders pursuant to Section 79-4-7.04 if:

Article 9, 10, 11 or 12,

The articles of incorporation or bylaws, or

The resolution of the board of directors authorizing the corporate action;

The challenge to the corporate action is brought by a shareholder who did not consent and as to whom notice of the approval of the corporate action was not effective at least ten (10) days before the corporate action was effected; and

The proceeding challenging the corporate action is commenced within ten (10) days after notice of the approval of the corporation action is effective as to the shareholder bringing the proceeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2007.